Massachusetts, session 194th, H5611.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Water and Sewer 
Commission of the Town of Hopedale shall be the appointing authority for all employees of the 
water and sewer department and shall have the authority to appoint, employ, supervise, 
discipline, and remove such employees.